Georgia, session 2025_26, HB169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions for ad valorem taxation of property, is amended by revising
paragraph (11) of subsection (p) of Code Section 48-5-7.4, relating to preferential assessment
for bona fide conservation use property and bona fide residential transitional property, as
follows:
"(11)(A) Allowing part of the property subject to the covenant to be used for solar
generation of energy and conversion of such energy into heat or electricity, and the sale
of the same in accordance with applicable law, provided that, beginning on July 1,
H. B. 169 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 50 1137S
2026, this paragraph shall only apply in the case of obligations of contracts entered into
prior to July 1, 2026; provided, however, that this paragraph shall continue to apply to
property for which there is an option contract for a lease for solar generation of energy
and conversion of such energy into heat or electricity and such option contract is
included in a deed recorded in the land records of the county where the property is
located; and provided, further, that this paragraph shall stand repealed on July 1, 2036.
(B) The provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not allow the portion
of the property on which such solar energy generating equipment is located, as depicted
by a boundary survey prepared by a licensed surveyor, and which is subject to an
existing covenant to remain in the covenant. Such property shall be removed from the
existing covenant at the time of the installation of the solar energy generating
equipment and shall be subject to the penalty for breach of the covenant contained in
subsection (q) of this Code section and shall be subject to ad valorem taxation at fair
market value; or"
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising paragraph (6) of subsection (q) of Code
Section 48-5-7.7, relating to preferential assessment for forest land conservation use
property, as follows:
"(6)(A) Allowing part of the property subject to the covenant to be used for solar
generation of energy and conversion of such energy into heat or electricity, and the sale
of the same in accordance with applicable law, provided that, beginning on July 1,
2026, this paragraph shall only apply in the case of obligations of contracts entered into
prior to July 1, 2026; provided, however, that this paragraph shall continue to apply to
property for which there is an option contract for a lease for solar generation of energy
and conversion of such energy into heat or electricity and such option contract is
H. B. 169 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 50 1137S
included in a deed recorded in the land records of the county where the property is
located; and provided, further, that this paragraph shall stand repealed on July 1, 2036.
(B) The provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not allow the portion
of the property on which such solar energy generating equipment is located, as depicted
by a boundary survey prepared by a licensed surveyor, and which is subject to an
existing covenant to remain in the covenant. Such property shall be removed from the
existing covenant at the time of the installation of the solar energy generating
equipment and shall be subject to the penalty for breach of the covenant contained in
subsection (r) of this Code section and shall be subject to ad valorem taxation at fair
market value; or"
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 169 (SUB)
- 3 -